docs/src-fst-morphology-lexicon.lexc.md
q̓ʷuʔ "gather"
@U.TAM-A.PRF@

ʔəɬəd+V:ʔəɬəd

Adjectives
Adjectives in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language describe the entities nouns refer to.

Adpositions
Adpositions in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language 

Adverbs
Adverbs in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language are words that express time, place, degree, mode.

Conjunctors
Conjunctors in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language 

Interjections
Interjections in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language 

Nouns
Nouns in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language refer to objects or sets of objects, qualities, states or ideas.

Numerals
Numerals in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language describe a nuerical quantity.

Pronouns
Pronouns in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language are words that may replace nouns or refer to participants in the conversation.

Verbs
Verbs in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language inflect for tense.

Punctuation symbols

* __LEXICON Punctuation   __ contains the list
of punctuation symbols:
* Symbols like .,: are tagged with __+CLB__
* other symbols like +.& are tagged with __+PUNCT__, and
* paired symbols like ()«» are tagged with __+PUNCT+LEFT__
and __+PUNCT+RIGHT__, respectively.

The punctuation symbols are listed in the following groups:

* Clause boundary symbols:
* Single punctuation marks
* Paired punctuation marks

* __LEXICON PunctEnd   __ leads to # only.

Symbols
Symbols are single character special signs typically denoting whole nouns. They are different from
abbreviations and acronyms by not consisting of regular, alphabetic letters.

Symbols are syntactic constituents, and thus part of the sentence analysis. That is, they are
different from punctuation: punctuation express syntactic boundaries of various kinds, symbols
are syntactic constituents.

__LEXICON Symbols__ contains symbols of two types: those that inflect, and those that don't.

Miscellaneous symbols

Symbols from Mari OCR reading. TODO: Remove non-symbols + merge with list above

Smileys

Emojies

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-slh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc)</small>

---
